Nevada, session 83, SB304.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.460 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
the Department shall revoke the license, permit or privilege of any
driver upon receiving a record of his or her conviction of any of the
following offenses, when that conviction has become final, and
the driver is not eligible for a license, permit or privilege to drive for
the period indicated:
(a) For a period of 185 days, if the offense is a first violation
within 7 years of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120.
(b) For a period of 1 year if the offense is:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), any
manslaughter, including vehicular manslaughter as described in
NRS 484B.657, resulting from the driving of a motor vehicle or
felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used,
including the unlawful taking of a motor vehicle.
(2) Failure to stop and render aid as required pursuant to the
laws of this State in the event of a motor vehicle crash resulting in
the death or bodily injury of another.
(3) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement
under oath to the Department pursuant to NRS 483.010 to 483.630,
inclusive, or pursuant to any other law relating to the ownership or
driving of motor vehicles.
(4) Conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon three
charges of reckless driving committed within a period of 12 months.
(5) A second violation within 7 years of NRS 484C.110 or
484C.120.
(6) A violation of NRS 484B.550.
(c) For a period of 3 years if the offense is:
(1) A first violation of driving without an ignition interlock
device or tampering with an ignition interlock device pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 484C.470 and the driver is not eligible for a
restricted license or an ignition interlock privilege during any of that
period.
(2) A violation of subsection 9 of NRS 484B.653.
(3) A third or subsequent violation within 7 years of NRS
484C.110 or 484C.120.
(4) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 resulting in a
felony conviction pursuant to NRS 484C.400 or 484C.410.
(5) A violation of NRS 484C.430 or a homicide resulting
from driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance
-
*SB304_R1*

– 3 –
or resulting from any other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,]
or 484C.130 . [or 484C.430.]
 The period during which such a driver is not eligible for a
license, permit or privilege to drive must be set aside during any
period of imprisonment and the period of revocation must resume
when the Department is notified pursuant to NRS 209.517 or
213.12185 that the person has completed the period of
imprisonment or that the person has been placed on residential
confinement or parole.
(d) For a period of 5 years if the offense is a second or
subsequent violation of driving without an ignition interlock device
or tampering with an ignition interlock device pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 484C.470 and the driver is not eligible for a
restricted license or an ignition interlock privilege during any of that
period.
2. The Department shall revoke the license, permit or privilege
of a driver convicted of violating NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 who
fails to complete the educational course on the use of alcohol and
controlled substances within the time ordered by the court and shall
add a period of 90 days during which the driver is not eligible for a
license, permit or privilege to drive.
3. When the Department is notified by a court that a person
who has been convicted of a first violation within 7 years of NRS
484C.110 has been permitted to enter a program of treatment
pursuant to NRS 484C.320, the Department shall reduce by one-half
the period during which the person is not eligible for a license,
permit or privilege to drive, but shall restore that reduction in time if
notified that the person was not accepted for or failed to complete
the treatment.
4. In addition to any other requirements set forth by specific
statute, if the Department is notified that a court has ordered the
revocation, suspension or delay in the issuance of a license pursuant
to title 5 of NRS, NRS 206.330 or 392.148, chapters 484A to 484E,
inclusive, of NRS or any other provision of law, the Department
shall take such actions as are necessary to carry out the court’s
order.
Sec. 1.2. NRS 483.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.490 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, after
a driver’s license has been suspended or revoked and one-half of the
period during which the driver is not eligible for a license has
expired, the Department may, unless the statute authorizing the
suspension or revocation prohibits the issuance of a restricted
license, issue a restricted driver’s license to an applicant permitting
the applicant to drive a motor vehicle:
-
*SB304_R1*

– 4 –
(a) To and from work or in the course of his or her work, or
both; or
(b) To acquire supplies of medicine or food or receive regularly
scheduled medical care for himself, herself or a member of his or
her immediate family.
 Before a restricted license may be issued, the applicant must
submit sufficient documentary evidence to satisfy the Department
that a severe hardship exists because the applicant has no alternative
means of transportation and that the severe hardship outweighs the
risk to the public if the applicant is issued a restricted license.
2. If the driver’s license of a person assigned to a program
established pursuant to NRS 484C.392 is suspended or revoked, the
Department may issue a restricted driver’s license to an applicant
that is valid while he or she is participating in and complying with
the requirements of the program and that permits the applicant to
drive a motor vehicle:
(a) To and from a testing location established by a designated
law enforcement agency pursuant to NRS 484C.393;
(b) If applicable, to and from work or in the course of his or her
work, or both;
(c) To and from court appearances;
(d) To and from counseling; or
(e) To receive regularly scheduled medical care for himself or
herself.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 62E.630, after a
driver’s license has been revoked or suspended pursuant to title 5 of
NRS or NRS 392.148, the Department may issue a restricted
driver’s license to an applicant permitting the applicant to drive a
motor vehicle:
(a) If applicable, to and from work or in the course of his or her
work, or both; or
(b) If applicable, to and from school.
4. After a driver’s license has been suspended pursuant to NRS
483.443, the Department may issue a restricted driver’s license to an
applicant permitting the applicant to drive a motor vehicle:
(a) If applicable, to and from work or in the course of his or her
work, or both;
(b) To receive regularly scheduled medical care for himself,
herself or a member of his or her immediate family; or
(c) If applicable, as necessary to exercise a court-ordered right to
visit a child.
5. A driver who violates a condition of a restricted license
issued pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor and,
if the license of the driver was suspended or revoked for:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.210 or 484C.430;
-
*SB304_R1*

– 5 –
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,] or 484C.130 ; [or
484C.430;] or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b),
 the driver shall be punished in the manner provided pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 483.560.
6. The periods of suspensions and revocations required
pursuant to this chapter and NRS 484C.210 must run consecutively,
except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.465 and 483.475, when
the suspensions must run concurrently.
7. Whenever the Department suspends or revokes a license, the
period of suspension, or of ineligibility for a license after the
revocation, begins upon the effective date of the revocation or
suspension as contained in the notice thereof.
8. Any person for whom a court provides an exception relating
to the installation of an ignition interlock device pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 484C.210 or subsection 2 of NRS 484C.460 is
eligible for a restricted driver’s license under this section while the
person is participating in and complying with the requirements of a
program established pursuant to NRS 484C.392.
9. If the Department receives a copy of an order requiring a
person to install an ignition interlock device in a motor vehicle
pursuant to NRS 484C.460, the Department shall issue an ignition
interlock privilege to the person after he or she submits proof of
compliance with the order. A person who is required to install an
ignition interlock device pursuant to NRS 484C.210 or 484C.460
shall install the device not later than 14 days after the date on which
the order was issued. A driver who violates any condition of an
ignition interlock privilege issued pursuant to this subsection is
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished in the same manner
provided in subsection 2 of NRS 483.560 for driving a vehicle while
a driver’s license is cancelled, revoked or suspended.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 483.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.560 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
person who drives a motor vehicle on a highway or on premises to
which the public has access at a time when the person’s driver’s
license has been cancelled, revoked or suspended is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the
license of the person was suspended, revoked or restricted because
of:
-
*SB304_R1*

– 6 –
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120, 484C.210 or
484C.430;
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,] or 484C.130 ; [or
484C.430;] or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b),
 the person shall be punished by imprisonment in jail for not less
than 30 days nor more than 6 months or by serving a term of
residential confinement for not less than 60 days nor more than 6
months, and shall be further punished by a fine of not less than $500
nor more than $1,000. A person who is punished pursuant to this
subsection may not be granted probation, and a sentence imposed
for such a violation may not be suspended. A prosecutor may not
dismiss a charge of such a violation in exchange for a plea of guilty,
guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or for
any other reason, unless the prosecutor believes the charge is not
supported by probable cause or cannot be proved at trial. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply if the period of revocation
has expired but the person has not reinstated the license.
3. A term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section may be served intermittently at the discretion of the
judge or justice of the peace. This discretion must be exercised after
considering all the circumstances surrounding the offense, and the
family and employment of the person convicted. However, the full
term of imprisonment must be served within 6 months after the date
of conviction, and any segment of time the person is imprisoned
must not consist of less than 24 hours.
4. Jail sentences simultaneously imposed pursuant to this
section and NRS 484C.320, 484C.330, 484C.400, 484C.410 or
484C.420 must run consecutively.
5. If the Department receives a record of the conviction or
punishment of any person pursuant to this section upon a charge of
driving a vehicle while the person’s license was:
(a) Suspended, the Department shall extend the period of the
suspension for an additional like period.
(b) Revoked, the Department shall extend the period of
ineligibility for a license, permit or privilege to drive for an
additional 1 year.
(c) Restricted, the Department shall revoke the restricted license
and extend the period of ineligibility for a license, permit or
privilege to drive for an additional 1 year.
-
*SB304_R1*

– 7 –
(d) Suspended or cancelled for an indefinite period, the
Department shall suspend the license for an additional 6 months for
the first violation and an additional 1 year for each subsequent
violation.
6. Suspensions and revocations imposed pursuant to this
section must run consecutively.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 484C.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.130 1. A person commits vehicular homicide if the
person:
(a) Drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle on or off
the highways of this State and:
(1) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(2) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or
her blood or breath;
(3) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath;
(4) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is
under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(5) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle; or
(6) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 484C.110; and
(b) Proximately causes the death of another person while driving
or in actual physical control of a vehicle on or off the highways of
this State . [; and
(c) Has previously been convicted of at least three offenses.]
2. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a
sufficient quantity of alcohol after driving or being in actual
physical control of the vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath
was tested, to cause the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol
of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath. A defendant who
intends to offer this defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must,
not less than 14 days before the trial or hearing or at such other time
as the court may direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a
written notice of that intent.
[3. As used in this section, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430;
-
*SB304_R1*

– 8 –
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by this section or NRS 484C.110 or
484C.430; or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).]
Sec. 2. NRS 484C.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.340 1. An offender who enters a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere to a violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is
punishable pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS
484C.400 may, at the time the offender enters a plea, apply to the
court to undergo a program of treatment for an alcohol or other
substance use disorder for at least 3 years. The court may authorize
that treatment if:
(a) The offender is diagnosed as a person with an alcohol or
other substance use disorder by:
(1) An alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed or
certified, or a clinical alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed,
pursuant to chapter 641C of NRS, to make that diagnosis;
(2) A physician who is certified to make that diagnosis by the
Board of Medical Examiners;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who is certified to
make that diagnosis by the State Board of Nursing; and
(b) The offender agrees to pay the costs of the treatment to the
extent of his or her financial resources.
 An alcohol and drug counselor, a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, a physician or an advanced practice registered nurse who
diagnoses an offender as a person with an alcohol or other substance
use disorder shall make a report and recommendation to the court
concerning the length and type of treatment required for the
offender.
2. A prosecuting attorney may, within 10 days after receiving
notice of an application for treatment pursuant to this section,
request a hearing on the matter. The court shall order a hearing on
the application upon the request of the prosecuting attorney or may
order a hearing on its own motion.
3. At the hearing on the application for treatment, the
prosecuting attorney may present the court with any relevant
evidence on the matter. If a hearing is not held, the court shall
decide the matter and other information before the court.
4. If the court determines that an application for treatment
should be granted, the court shall:
-
*SB304_R1*

– 9 –
(a) Immediately, without entering a judgment of conviction and
with the consent of the offender, suspend further proceedings and
place the offender on probation for not more than 5 years.
(b) Order the offender to complete a program of treatment for an
alcohol or other substance use disorder with a treatment provider
approved by the court. If the court has a specialty court program for
the supervision and monitoring of the person, the treatment provider
must comply with the requirements of the specialty court, including,
without limitation, any requirement to submit progress reports to the
specialty court.
(c) Advise the offender that:
(1) He or she may be placed under the supervision of a
treatment provider for not more than 5 years.
(2) The court may order the offender to be admitted to a
residential treatment facility.
(3) The court will enter a judgment of conviction for a
violation of paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 if a
treatment provider fails to accept the offender for a program of
treatment for an alcohol or other substance use disorder or if the
offender fails to complete the program of treatment satisfactorily.
Any sentence of imprisonment may be reduced by a time equal to
that which the offender served before beginning treatment.
(4) If the offender completes the treatment satisfactorily, the
court will enter a judgment of conviction for a violation of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400.
(5) The provisions of NRS 483.460 requiring the revocation
of the license, permit or privilege of the offender to drive do not
apply.
5. The court shall administer the program of treatment pursuant
to the procedures provided in NRS 176A.230 to 176A.245,
inclusive, except that the court:
(a) Shall not defer the sentence or set aside the conviction upon
the election of treatment, except as otherwise provided in this
section; and
(b) May enter a judgment of conviction and proceed as provided
in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 for a violation of
a condition ordered by the court.
6. To participate in a program of treatment, the offender must:
(a) Serve not less than 6 months of residential confinement;
(b) Be placed under a system of active electronic monitoring,
through the Division, that is capable of identifying the offender’s
location and producing, upon request, reports or records of the
offender’s presence near or within, or departure from, a specified
geographic location and pay any costs associated with the offender’s
participation under the system of active electronic monitoring;
-
*SB304_R1*

– 10 –
(c) Install, at his or her own expense, an ignition interlock
device for not less than 12 months;
(d) Not drive any vehicle unless it is equipped with an ignition
interlock device;
(e) Agree to be subject to periodic testing for the use of alcohol
or controlled substances while participating in a program of
treatment; and
(f) Agree to any other conditions that the court deems necessary.
7. An offender may not apply to the court to undergo a
program of treatment for an alcohol or other substance use disorder
pursuant to this section if the offender has previously applied to
receive treatment pursuant to this section or if the offender has
previously been convicted of:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(b) A violation of NRS 484C.130;
(c) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,] or 484C.130 ; [or 484C.430;]
(d) A violation of paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 484C.400;
(e) A violation of NRS 484C.410; or
(f) A violation of law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits the
same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d).
8. An offender placed under a system of active electronic
monitoring pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 6 shall:
(a) Follow the instructions provided by the Division to maintain
the electronic monitoring device in working order.
(b) Report any incidental damage or defacement of the
electronic monitoring device to the Division within 2 hours after the
occurrence of the damage or defacement.
(c) Abide by any other conditions set forth by the court or the
Division with regard to the offender’s participation under the system
of active electronic monitoring.
9. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person
who intentionally removes or disables or attempts to remove or
disable an electronic monitoring device placed on an offender
pursuant to this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The
provisions of this subsection do not prohibit a person authorized by
the Division from performing maintenance or repairs to an
electronic monitoring device.
10. As used is this section, “Division” means the Division of
Parole and Probation of the Department of Public Safety.
-
*SB304_R1*

– 11 –
Sec. 3. NRS 484C.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.400 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 484C.430 or 484C.440, and except as otherwise provided in
NRS 484C.394 or 484C.410, a person who violates the provisions
of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120:
(a) For the first offense within 7 years, is guilty of a
misdemeanor. Unless the person is allowed to undergo treatment as
provided in NRS 484C.320, the court shall:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (4) of this
paragraph or subsection 3 of NRS 484C.420, order the person to pay
tuition for an educational course on alcohol or other substance use
disorders approved by the Department and complete the course
within the time specified in the order, and the court shall notify the
Department if the person fails to complete the course within the
specified time;
(2) Unless the sentence is reduced pursuant to
NRS 484C.320:
(I) Sentence the person to imprisonment for not less than
2 days nor more than 6 months in jail or residential confinement for
not less than 2 days nor more than 6 months, in the manner provided
in NRS 4.376 to 4.3766, inclusive, or 5.0755 to 5.078, inclusive; or
(II) Order the person to perform not less than 48 hours,
but not more than 96 hours, of community service;
(3) Fine the person not less than $400 nor more than $1,000;
and
(4) If the person is found to have a concentration of alcohol
of 0.18 or more in his or her blood or breath, order the person to
attend a program of treatment for an alcohol or other substance use
disorder pursuant to the provisions of NRS 484C.360.
(b) For a second offense within 7 years, is guilty of a
misdemeanor. Unless the sentence is reduced pursuant to NRS
484C.330, the court shall:
(1) Sentence the person to:
(I) Imprisonment for not less than 10 days nor more than
6 months in jail; or
(II) Residential confinement for not less than 10 days nor
more than 6 months, in the manner provided in NRS 4.376 to
4.3766, inclusive, or 5.0755 to 5.078, inclusive;
(2) Fine the person not less than $750 nor more than $1,000,
or order the person to perform an equivalent number of hours of
community service; and
(3) Order the person to attend a program of treatment for an
alcohol or other substance use disorder pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 484C.360.
-
*SB304_R1*

– 12 –
 A person who willfully fails or refuses to complete successfully a
term of residential confinement or a program of treatment ordered
pursuant to this paragraph is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484C.340, for a third
offense within 7 years, is guilty of a category B felony and the
court:
(1) Shall:
(I) Sentence the person to imprisonment in the state
prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum
term of not more than 6 years; and
(II) Fine the person not less than $2,000 nor more than
$5,000; and
(2) May order the person to attend a program of treatment for
an alcohol or other substance use disorder pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 484C.360 if the results of an evaluation conducted pursuant
to NRS 484C.300 indicate that the person has an alcohol or other
substance use disorder and that the person can be treated
successfully for his or her condition.
 An offender who is imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this
paragraph must, insofar as practicable, be segregated from offenders
whose crimes were violent and, insofar as practicable, be assigned
to an institution or facility of minimum security.
2. An offense that occurred within 7 years immediately
preceding the date of the principal offense or after the principal
offense constitutes a prior offense for the purposes of this section:
(a) When evidenced by a conviction; or
(b) If the offense is conditionally dismissed or the judgment of
conviction is set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.240, 176A.260 or
176A.290 or dismissed in connection with successful completion of
a diversionary program or specialty court program,
 without regard to the sequence of the offenses and convictions.
The facts concerning a prior offense must be alleged in the
complaint, indictment or information, must not be read to the jury or
proved at trial but must be proved at the time of sentencing and, if
the principal offense is alleged to be a felony, must also be shown at
the preliminary examination or presented to the grand jury.
3. A term of confinement imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section may be served intermittently at the discretion of the
judge or justice of the peace, except that a person who is convicted
of a second or subsequent offense within 7 years must be confined
for at least one segment of not less than 48 consecutive hours. This
discretion must be exercised after considering all the circumstances
surrounding the offense, and the family and employment of the
offender, but any sentence of 30 days or less must be served within
6 months after the date of conviction or, if the offender was
-
*SB304_R1*

– 13 –
sentenced pursuant to NRS 484C.320 or 484C.330 and the
suspension of his or her sentence was revoked, within 6 months
after the date of revocation. Any time for which the offender is
confined must consist of not less than 24 consecutive hours.
4. Jail sentences simultaneously imposed pursuant to this
section and NRS 482.456, 483.560, 484C.410 or 485.330 must run
consecutively.
5. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the
court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining
the sentence of the defendant.
6. For the purpose of determining whether one offense occurs
within 7 years of another offense, any period of time between the
two offenses during which, for any such offense, the offender is
imprisoned, serving a term of residential confinement, placed under
the supervision of a treatment provider, on parole or on probation
must be excluded.
7. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430;
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,] or 484C.130 ; [or
484C.430;] or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 4. NRS 484C.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.410 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS
484C.440, a person who has previously been convicted of:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
as a felony pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 484C.400;
(b) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(c) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,] or 484C.130 ; [or 484C.430;]
(d) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a), (b) or (c);
or
(e) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 that was
reduced from a felony pursuant to NRS 484C.340,
-
*SB304_R1*

– 14 –
 and who violates the provisions of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, and shall be further
punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more than $5,000. An
offender so imprisoned must, insofar as practicable, be segregated
from offenders whose crimes were violent and, insofar as
practicable, be assigned to an institution or facility of minimum
security.
2. An offense which is listed in paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive,
of subsection 1 that occurred on any date preceding the date of the
principal offense or after the principal offense constitutes a prior
offense for the purposes of this section when evidenced by a
conviction, without regard for the sequence of the offenses and
convictions. The facts concerning a prior offense must be alleged in
the complaint, indictment or information, must not be read to the
jury or proved at trial but must be proved at the time of sentencing
and, if the principal offense is alleged to be a felony, must also be
shown at the preliminary examination or presented to the grand jury.
3. A term of confinement imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section may be served intermittently at the discretion of the
judge or justice of the peace, except that a person who is convicted
of a second or subsequent offense within 7 years must be confined
for at least one segment of not less than 48 consecutive hours. This
discretion must be exercised after considering all the circumstances
surrounding the offense, and the family and employment of the
offender, but any sentence of 30 days or less must be served within
6 months after the date of conviction or, if the offender was
sentenced pursuant to NRS 484C.320 or 484C.330 and the
suspension of offender’s sentence was revoked, within 6 months
after the date of revocation. Any time for which the offender is
confined must consist of not less than 24 consecutive hours.
4. Jail sentences simultaneously imposed pursuant to this
section and NRS 482.456, 483.560, 484C.400 or 485.330 must run
consecutively.
5. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the
court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining
the sentence of the defendant.
6. For the purpose of determining whether one offense occurs
within 7 years of another offense, any period of time between the
two offenses during which, for any such offense, the offender is
imprisoned, serving a term of residential confinement, placed under
the supervision of a treatment provider, on parole or on probation
must be excluded.
-
*SB304_R1*

– 15 –
7. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430;
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110 [,] or 484C.130 ; [or
484C.430;] or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 5. NRS 484C.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.430 1. [Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 484C.440, a] A person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath;
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath;
(d) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is under
the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(e) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle; or
(f) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 484C.110,
 and does any act or neglects any duty imposed by law while
driving or in actual physical control of any vehicle on or off the
highways of this State, if the act or neglect of duty proximately
causes [the death of, or] substantial bodily harm to [,] another
person, is guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 20 years and
must be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more
than $5,000. A person so imprisoned must, insofar as practicable, be
segregated from offenders whose crimes were violent and, insofar as
practicable, be assigned to an institution or facility of minimum
security.
2. A prosecuting attorney shall not dismiss a charge of
violating the provisions of subsection 1 in exchange for a plea of
guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or
for any other reason unless the attorney knows or it is obvious that
-
*SB304_R1*

– 16 –
the charge is not supported by probable cause or cannot be proved at
the time of trial. A sentence imposed pursuant to subsection 1 may
not be suspended nor may probation be granted.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if
consumption is proven by a preponderance of the evidence, it is an
affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of subsection 1 that the
defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after driving or
being in actual physical control of the vehicle, and before his or her
blood or breath was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial
or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial or
hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and serve
on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
4. If the defendant is also charged with violating the provisions
of NRS 484E.010, 484E.020 or 484E.030, the defendant may not
offer the affirmative defense set forth in subsection 3.
5. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the
court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining
the sentence of the defendant.
Sec. 6. NRS 458.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
458.260 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
use of alcohol, the status of drunkard and the fact of being found in
an intoxicated condition are not:
(a) Public offenses and shall not be so treated in any ordinance
or resolution of a county, city or town.
(b) Elements of an offense giving rise to a criminal penalty or
civil sanction.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) A civil or administrative violation for which intoxication is
an element of the violation pursuant to the provisions of a specific
statute or regulation;
(b) A criminal offense for which intoxication is an element of
the offense pursuant to the provisions of a specific statute or
regulation;
(c) A homicide resulting from driving, operating or being in
actual physical control of a vehicle, a power-driven vessel or a
sailing vessel under way while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130, [484C.430,] subsection 2
of NRS 488.400, NRS 488.410, 488.420 or 488.425; and
(d) Any offense or violation which is similar to an offense or
violation described in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) and which is set forth
in an ordinance or resolution of a county, city or town.
-
*SB304_R1*

– 17 –
3. This section does not make intoxication an excuse or
defense for any criminal act.
Sec. 7. NRS 458.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
458.270 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a
person who is found in any public place under the influence of
alcohol, in such a condition that the person is unable to exercise care
for his or her health or safety or the health or safety of other persons,
must be placed under civil protective custody by a peace officer.
2. A peace officer may use upon such a person the kind and
degree of force which would be lawful if the peace officer were
effecting an arrest for a misdemeanor with a warrant.
3. If a licensed facility for the treatment of persons with an
alcohol use disorder that has been certified by the Division for civil
protective custody exists in the community where the person is
found, the person must be delivered to the facility for observation
and care. If no such facility exists in the community, the person so
found may be placed in a county or city jail or detention facility for
shelter or supervision for his or her health and safety until he or she
is no longer under the influence of alcohol. The person may not be
required against his or her will to remain in a licensed facility, jail or
detention facility longer than 48 hours.
4. An intoxicated person taken into custody by a peace officer
for a public offense must immediately be taken to a secure
detoxification unit or other appropriate medical facility if the
condition of the person appears to require emergency medical
treatment. Upon release from the detoxification unit or medical
facility, the person must immediately be remanded to the custody of
the apprehending peace officer and the criminal proceedings
proceed as prescribed by law.
5. The placement of a person found under the influence of
alcohol in civil protective custody must be:
(a) Recorded at the facility, jail or detention facility to which the
person is delivered; and
(b) Communicated at the earliest practical time to the person’s
family or next of kin if they can be located.
6. Every peace officer and other public employee or agency
acting pursuant to this section is performing a discretionary function
or duty.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a person who
is apprehended or arrested for:
(a) A civil or administrative violation for which intoxication is
an element of the violation pursuant to the provisions of a specific
statute or regulation;
-
*SB304_R1*

– 18 –
(b) A criminal offense for which intoxication is an element of
the offense pursuant to the provisions of a specific statute or
regulation;
(c) A homicide resulting from driving, operating or being in
actual physical control of a vehicle, a power-driven vessel or a
sailing vessel under way while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130, [484C.430,] subsection 2
of NRS 488.400, NRS 488.410, 488.420 or 488.425; and
(d) Any offense or violation which is similar to an offense or
violation described in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) and which is set forth
in an ordinance or resolution of a county, city or town.
H
-
*SB304_R1*